Maryland, session 2026, SB0711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–701.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in § 5–705.1 of this subtitle, in this subtitle the
following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Child” means any individual under the age of 18 years.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0711*

SENATE BILL 711
(s) (1) “Neglect” means the leaving of a child unattended or other failure to
give proper care and attention to a child by any parent or other person who has permanent
or temporary care or custody or responsibility for supervision of the child under
circumstances that indicate:
[(1)] (I) that the child’s health or welfare is harmed or placed at
substantial risk of harm; or
[(2)] (II) mental injury to the child or a substantial risk of mental injury.
(2) “NEGLECT” INCLUDES THE FAILURE OR REFUSAL TO PROVIDE TO
A CHILD THE EDUCATION REQUIRED BY LAW BY ANY PARENT OR OTHER PERSON
WHO HAS PERMANENT OR TEMPORARY CARE OR CUSTODY OR RESPONSIBILITY FOR
SUPERVISION OF THE CHILD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.